Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 1

Dog and Cat Dealers

44-17-101. Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to protect the owners of dogs and cats from the theft of their pets, to prevent the sale or use of dogs and cats that have been stolen, and to ensure the humane treatment of dogs and cats in commerce and those used in research facilities.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-104.

Cross-References. Farm Animal and Research Facilities Protection Act, title 39, ch. 14, part 8.

Humane treatment of animals not subject to state game and fish laws, §5-9-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 9.

Comparative Legislation. Dogs and cats:

Ala. Code §3-6-1 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §4-8-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 258.095 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §41-53-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 273.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 67-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-796.66 et seq.

Collateral References. 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 94-99, 113.

3A C.J.S. Animals § 232.

Animals
4.

44-17-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cat” means any live cat of the species Felis catus;

“Commerce” means buying or selling or transporting from one (1) place to another in this state;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Dealer” means any person who, for compensation or profit, buys, sells, transports (except as a common carrier), delivers for transportation, or boards dogs or cats for research purposes, or any person who buys or sells twenty-five (25) or more dogs or cats in any one (1) calendar year for resale within the state or for transportation out of the state;

“Dealer” also means any person who, for compensation or profit, buys from or sells to a private person at a flea market any dog or cat;

“Dog” means any live dog of the species Canis familiaris;

“Flea market” means any assemblage of twenty (20) or more persons gathered together at regular or irregular intervals, whether in open air or under cover, for the purpose of buying, selling, or trading merchandise to and from the general public, when this buying, selling, or trading is outside of the regular business or occupation of the majority of persons so gathered, and when the majority of the persons so gathered do not pay a business privilege tax for their activities at the flea market;

“Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity; and

“Research facility” means any school, hospital, laboratory, institution, organization or person that uses or intends to use dogs or cats in research, tests, or experiments and that purchases or transports dogs or cats in commerce.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 2; 1978, ch. 640, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 44-105.

Law Reviews.

Backyard Breeding: Regulatory Nuisance, Crime Precursor, 85 Tenn. L. Rev. 707 (Spring 2018).

44-17-103. Sale or transportation of dogs or cats to research facilities by dealers without license prohibited.

It is unlawful for any dealer to sell or offer to sell or transport or offer for transportation to any research facility any dog or cat, or to buy, sell, offer to buy or sell, transport or offer for transportation in commerce any dog or cat, unless the dealer has a currently valid license from the commissioner and has complied with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this part.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 3; T.C.A., § 44-106; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

Cited: State v. Adkisson, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 320 (Tenn. Crim. App. May 2, 2012).

44-17-104. Applications for license — Fee.

An application for a license as a dealer shall be made to the commissioner on a form provided by the commissioner, which shall contain space for such information as the commissioner may reasonably require, including evidence of ability to comply with such standards, rules and regulations as are lawfully prescribed by the commissioner.

Each application for a license shall be accompanied by a license fee based upon the following:

Dealer license fee to sell dogs or cats to research facilities — two hundred and fifty dollars ($250);

Dealer license fee (wholesale) to sell dogs or cats for resale — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125);

Dealer license fee (retail) to buy dogs or cats for resale to be assessed as follows:

Transactions of up to 50 animals per year — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125);

Transactions of 51 to 150 animals per year — two hundred and fifty dollars ($250);

Transactions of 151 to 300 animals per year — five hundred dollars ($500);

Transactions of 301 to 500 animals per year — seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750); and

Transactions of more than 500 animals per year — one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

Dealer license fee to transport dogs or cats in commerce — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125).

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 4; T.C.A., § 44-107; Acts 2002, ch. 774, § 1.

44-17-105. Issuance of dealer's license — Requirements.

The commissioner shall issue a license to an applicant after determining:

The applicant or the responsible officers of the applicant are of good moral character;

The applicant or any responsible officer of the applicant has never been convicted of cruelty to animals or of a violation of this part;

An inspection has been made of the premises and a finding that it conforms to this part and the rules and regulations of the commissioner, and is a suitable place in which to conduct the dealer's business; and

The dealer's business is to be conducted in a permanent structure or building.

Each license shall be issued only for the premises and to the person or persons named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the commissioner.

Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 5; T.C.A., § 44-108.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

44-17-106. Annual renewal of dealer's license — Fee.

A license, unless sooner suspended or revoked, shall be renewable annually upon filing by the licensee and approval by the commissioner, of an annual report upon such forms and containing such information as the commissioner may prescribe by regulation. The fee for renewal of licenses shall be based upon the following:

Dealer license fee to sell dogs or cats to research facilities — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125);

Dealer license fee (wholesale) to sell dogs or cats for resale — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125);

Dealer license fee (retail) to buy dogs or cats for resale to be assessed as follows:

Transactions of up to 50 animals per year — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125);

Transactions of 51 to 150 animals per year — two hundred and fifty dollars ($250);

Transactions of 151 to 300 animals per year — five hundred dollars ($500);

Transactions of 301 to 500 animals per year — seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750); and

Transactions of more than 500 animals per year — one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

Dealer license fee to transport dogs or cats in commerce — one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125).

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 6; T.C.A., § 44-109; Acts 2002, ch. 774, § 2.

44-17-107. Revocation or suspension of dealer's license — Grounds — Hearing — Appeal.

The license of any dealer may be suspended or revoked by the commissioner for any of the following reasons:

The incompetence or untrustworthiness of the licensee;

Willful falsification of any information contained in the application;

The conviction of the licensee or any responsible officer of the licensee of cruelty to animals or a violation of this part; or

The nonconformance by the licensee to this part or the rules and regulations of the commissioner.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that the license of any dealer should be suspended or revoked for any of the above reasons, the commissioner shall give the dealer ten (10) days' written notice of the commissioner's intention to suspend or revoke the license of the dealer and shall give the dealer an opportunity for a hearing on the issue. The dealer may produce evidence to show cause why the license should not be revoked or suspended. If the commissioner determines that conditions exist that warrant the suspension or revocation of the license, the commissioner may suspend the license for such period of time as the commissioner may specify or may revoke it, and where appropriate, may make an order that the dealer cease and desist from continuing any violation found to have been made of this part. If the license is suspended, the dealer may apply, after ninety (90) days, for reinstatement of the license.

Any dealer aggrieved by a final order of the commissioner issued under this section may, within sixty (60) days after entry of such an order, have the order reviewed upon petition of certiorari in the chancery or circuit court of the county in which the dealer's residence or place of business is located.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 7; T.C.A., § 44-110.

44-17-108. Semi-annual reports to commissioner.

Each dealer shall file, on forms and at such times as prescribed by the commissioner, semi-annual reports containing the following information:

The number of dogs or cats in the possession of the dealer on the date the report is filed;

The number of dogs and cats purchased during the reporting period and the names and addresses of the persons from whom they were purchased;

The number of dogs and cats sold during the reporting period and the names and addresses of the persons to whom they were sold; and

The number of dogs and cats received by the dealer during the reporting period under circumstances other than purchase and the names and addresses of the persons from whom they were obtained.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 8; T.C.A., § 44-111.

44-17-109. Registration of research facilities with commissioner.

Every research facility shall register with the commissioner in accordance with such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 9; T.C.A., § 44-112.

44-17-110. Identification of dogs and cats delivered to research facilities.

All dogs and cats delivered for transportation, transported, purchased, or sold to research facilities shall be marked or identified in such manner as the commissioner may prescribe.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 10; T.C.A., § 44-113.

44-17-111. Records of research facilities and dealers.

Research facilities and dealers shall make and keep such records with respect to their purchase, sale, transportation, and handling of dogs and cats as the commissioner may prescribe.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 11; T.C.A., § 44-114.

44-17-112. Sales of dogs and cats to research facilities — Restrictions.

Dogs and cats shall not be offered for sale or sold to a research facility at public auction or by weight. No research facility shall purchase dogs or cats at public auction or by weight, nor shall any research facility purchase dogs or cats except from a licensed dealer, public pound, humane society, or from a person who breeds dogs or cats for sale to a research facility.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 12; T.C.A., § 44-115.

44-17-113. Bills of sale evidencing purchase of dogs or cats by dealers or research facilities.

The purchase of any dog or cat by a dealer or by a research facility shall be evidenced by a bill of sale signed by the seller. The bill of sale shall be in form approved by the commissioner and shall certify that the seller is the lawful owner of the dog or cat and that ownership is transferred to the dealer or research facility. The bill of sale shall make reference to the mark or identification required by § 44-17-110.

The bill of sale shall bear the name, telephone number, and address of the seller, and the driver license or social security number of the seller. At the time of sale, the dealer or research facility making the purchase shall verify from the seller the seller's driver license or social security number, whichever is appropriate. The bill of sale shall also contain a description of the dog or cat sold under that bill adequate to identify the animal. A bill of sale containing the same information shall be furnished by a dealer to any person purchasing a dog or cat at a flea market. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed as enlarging the enforcement responsibilities of the commissioner beyond that existing prior to March 17, 1978.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 13; 1978, ch. 640, § 3; T.C.A., § 44-116.

44-17-114. Time dealers must hold dogs and cats after acquisition.

No dealer shall sell or otherwise dispose of any dog or cat within a period of five (5) business days after the acquisition of the animal or within such other period as may be specified by the commissioner.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 14; T.C.A., § 44-117.

44-17-115. Authority of commissioner to inspect premises of dealers or research facilities — Inspection of conveyances — Rules and regulations regarding inspection.

The premises of any dealer or research facility shall be made available to the commissioner or the commissioner's representative for inspection at all reasonable times. The commissioner or the commissioner's representative shall make or cause to be made such inspections or investigations of the premises as considered necessary.

The commissioner or the commissioner's representative, or any legally constituted law enforcement agency, may stop any motor vehicle or other conveyance transporting dogs or cats for inspections as to the humane treatment of animals and compliance with licensing requirements of this part or for investigations in search of lost or stolen animals.

The commissioner shall issue rules and regulations requiring licensed dealers and research facilities to permit inspection of their animals and records at reasonable hours upon request by legally constituted law enforcement agencies in search of lost animals.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as authorizing the commissioner to promulgate rules, regulations, or orders governing the handling, care, treatment or inspection of animals during actual research or experimentation by a research facility.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 15; T.C.A., § 44-118; Acts 2002, ch. 774, § 3.

44-17-116. Violations of provisions a misdemeanor.

A person who violates any of the provisions of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

After notice of any violation received from the commissioner, each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 16; T.C.A., § 44-119; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

44-17-117. Construction and enforcement of provisions.

When construing or enforcing §§44-17-101 —44-17-107, the act, omission, or failure of any individual acting for or employed by a dealer or research facility, within the scope of the individual's employment or office, shall be considered to be the act, omission, or failure of the dealer or research facility as well as of the individual.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 17; T.C.A., § 44-120.

44-17-118. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to implement this part.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 18; T.C.A., § 44-121; Acts 2002, ch. 774, § 6.

44-17-119. Supplemental provisions.

This part is in addition to and supplementary of title 39, chapter 14, part 2.

Acts 1967, ch. 332, § 19; T.C.A., § 44-122; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 45.

44-17-120. Destruction of dog causing death or serious injury to human — Notice to dog's owner.

Any dog that attacks a human and causes death or serious bodily injury may be destroyed upon the order of the judge of the general sessions court of the county wherein the attack occurred. Such orders shall be granted on the petition of the district attorney general for the county. The petition shall name the owner of the dog, and the owner shall be given notice in accordance with Rule 4.01 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, that if the owner does not appear before the court within five (5) days of the receipt thereof and show cause why the dog should not be destroyed, then the order shall issue and the dog shall be destroyed.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), in counties having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), or having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, a municipality or county is authorized to adopt local ordinances authorizing the municipality or the county to appropriately petition in a general sessions court to provide for the disposition of dangerous dogs or dogs causing death or serious bodily injury to humans or other animals.

Acts 1978, ch. 757, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-123; Acts 1999, ch. 85, § 1; 2010, ch. 882, § 1; 2014, ch. 562, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment, in (a), substituted “serious bodily injury” for “serious injury” in the first sentence, and substituted “given notice in accordance with Rule 4.01 of the Tennessee rules of civil procedure,” for “given notice as in civil cases,” in the third sentence; and, in (b), substituted “population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), or having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census” for “population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000), according to the 1990 federal census”, substituted “dangerous dogs or dogs” for “dangerous dogs and/or dogs”, and substituted “serious bodily injury” for “serious injury”.

The 2014 amendment substituted “judge of the general sessions court” for “judge of the circuit court” in the first sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 882, § 2. May 5, 2010.

Acts 2014, ch. 562, § 2. July 1, 2014.

44-17-121. Confiscation of animals.

Subject to this part, the commissioner has the authority to confiscate animals as may be necessary to provide for the humane treatment of such animals.

Acts 2002, ch. 774, § 4.

44-17-122. Cooperation with local and federal authorities.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative agreements with local and/or federal agencies for purposes of implementing this part. When implementing the provisions for issuance of dealer licenses, the commissioner shall take into consideration other federal and/or local licensing regulations that may apply, it being the intent of the legislature not to impose duplicative licensing requirements and costs for dealers.

Acts 2002, ch. 774, § 5.